Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.48.120

Civil disorder training.

(1) A person is guilty of civil disorder training if he or she teaches or demonstrates to any other person the use, application, or making of any device or technique capable of causing significant bodily injury or death to persons, knowing, or having reason to know or intending that same will be unlawfully employed for use in, or in furtherance of, a civil disorder.

(2) Civil disorder training is a class B felony.

(3) Nothing in this section makes unlawful any act of any law enforcement officer that is performed in the lawful performance of his or her official duties.

(4) Nothing in this section makes unlawful any act of firearms training, target shooting, or other firearms activity, so long as it is not done for the purpose of furthering a civil disorder.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Civil disorder" means any public disturbance involving acts of violence that is intended to cause an immediate danger of, or to result in, significant injury to property or the person of any other individual.

(b) "Law enforcement officer" means any law enforcement officer as defined in RCW 9A.76.020(2) including members of the Washington national guard, as defined in RCW 38.04.010.

[ 2008 c 206 s 1; 2002 c 340 s 1.]